apertium-oci.oci.metadix
<!-- tier i vier es distingeixen per les 2nes persones de l'imp -->
        <pardef n="v/ier__vblex">        
      <e><p><l>ieríem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ieria</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ieríetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ieries</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ierien</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ierie</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ieram</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ierè</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ieratz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ieràs</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ieràn</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ierà</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ient</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ient</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguent</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguent</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguérem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguí</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguéretz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguís</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>engueres</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>engueren</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguec</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>engam</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>engam</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguésquem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguésquem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>ietz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ietz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iende</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iende</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguen</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguen</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>engue</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>engue</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>ier</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguer</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>ier</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>ié</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>ié</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran" r="LR"><p><l>engué</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon" r="LR"><p><l>engué</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ié</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>énguer</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>énguer</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>engué</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>iégem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ieja</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iégetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ieges</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iegen</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iege</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguíem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguia</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguíetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguies</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguien</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>enguie</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iévem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieva</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iévetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieves</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieven</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieve</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguéssem</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguessa</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguéssetz</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>enguesses</l><r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        

    <e lm="provier"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="convier" alt="oci"><i>conv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convier" alt="oci@aran"><i>conv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convier" alt="oci@gascon"><i>conv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="intervier" alt="oci"><i>interv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="intervier" alt="oci@aran"><i>interv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="intervier" alt="oci@gascon"><i>interv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="previer" alt="oci"><i>prev</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="previer" alt="oci@aran"><i>prev</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="previer" alt="oci@gascon"><i>prev</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="provier" alt="oci"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provier" alt="oci@aran"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provier" alt="oci@gascon"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci" r="LR"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@aran" r="LR"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@gascon" r="LR"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@aran" r="RL"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@gascon" r="RL"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="vier" alt="oci"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vier" alt="oci@aran"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vier" alt="oci@gascon"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="vier" alt="oci"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>èster</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>èster</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier" alt="oci@aran"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>èster</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>èster</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier" alt="oci@gascon"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>èster</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>èster</g></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="vier efectiu" alt="oci"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>efectiu</l><r><g><b/>efectiu</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier efectiu" alt="oci@aran"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>efectiu</l><r><g><b/>efectiu</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier efectiu" alt="oci@gascon"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>efectiu</l><r><g><b/>efectiu</g></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="vier de gust" alt="oci"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>gust</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>gust</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier de gust" alt="oci@aran"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>gust</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>gust</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="vier de gust" alt="oci@gascon"><i>v</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>gust</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>gust</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="devier"><i>dev</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="contravier" a="mmonge" alt="oci"><i>contrav</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contravier" a="mmonge" alt="oci@aran"><i>contrav</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contravier" a="mmonge" alt="oci@gascon"><i>contrav</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="avier" a="mmonge" alt="oci"><i>av</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avier" a="mmonge" alt="oci@aran"><i>av</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avier" a="mmonge" alt="oci@gascon"><i>av</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="subervier" a="mmonge"><i>suberv</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@aran" r="LR"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="provier de" alt="oci@gascon" r="LR"><i>prov</i><par n="v/ier__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
